Wyoming statutes. Title 28 Legislature
Article 1. Select Water Committee

§ 28-11-101.
Appointment of members; powers and duties; related duties of water development commission.

Not later than March 31 following each general election, a select water committee shall be appointed subject to the following:

The president of the senate shall appoint six (6) members of the senate apportioned as nearly as possible to reflect the percentage of the elected membership of the majority and minority parties of the senate, provided not more than five (5) of the members shall be from the same political party;

The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint six (6) members of the house apportioned as nearly as possible to reflect the percentage of the elected membership of the majority and minority parties of the house, provided not more than five (5) of the members shall be from the same political party;

Insofar as possible, of the six (6) members appointed from each house, one (1) shall reside in and be appointed from each of the four (4) water divisions in the state and two (2) at large. The presiding officer may appoint three (3) of the six (6) members at large, provided that no more than two (2) members shall reside in the same water division.

The select committee shall:

Select from among its members a chairman and vice-chairman;

Monitor water development commission progress with regard to projects specified in Chapter 60, 1982 Session Laws and other projects specified by law;

Prepare and submit to the joint agriculture, state and public lands and water resources interim committee as part of the report required of the water development commission under W.S. 41-2-118(a) not later than January 1 of each year a report detailing the water development commission’s progress, the activities of the committee, specifying any committee recommendations and continue development of a water policy as provided by Section 15, Chapter 60, 1982 Session Laws;

Repealed by Laws 1986, ch. 113, § 14.

Review the budgets of all projects and make recommendations regardless of funding source.

The water development commission shall:

Provide the select committee with notice of all commission meetings. The select committee and the commission may hold joint meetings;

Not enter into any contract or contract amendment involving the expenditure of more than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00) of any funds authorized for any project under Chapter 60, 1982 Session Laws or under W.S.

41-2-114

, until thirty (30) days after the contract or contract amendment has been submitted to the legislative service office for distribution to members of the select committee for review and recommendation;

Provide information to the select committee upon request to assist the select committee to monitor progress.

The select committee may:

Secure consulting services, if necessary, to provide technical assistance in inspecting and reviewing construction projects, drilling programs, budgets or other issues related to the water projects approved by the legislature;

Review the budgets prepared by the water development commission for each separate water project under its control;

Inspect any construction, drilling or waterworks on approved water projects.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 12, § 1; 1985, ch. 228, § 2; 1986, ch. 113, §§ 1, 14; 1987, ch. 57, § 1; 1992, ch. 40, § 1; 1995, ch. 82, § 1; 1997, ch. 31, § 2; 1999, ch. 1, § 1; 2007, ch. 33, § 1; 2011, ch. 129, § 203; ch. 198, § 1; 2017 ch. 18, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Cross references. —

As to creation of Wyoming water development commission, see §

41-2-117

.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, inserted “state and” in (b)(iii).

The 2011 amendments. —

The first 2011 amendment, by ch. 129, § 203, effective July 1, 2011, in (b)(i), deleted “and secretary” at the end, and made related changes.

The second 2011 amendment, by ch. 198 § 1, in the introductory language of (a), substituted “31” for “15”; and substituted “five (5)” for “four (4)” in (a)(i) and (a)(ii).

Laws 2011, ch. 198 § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2011.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, at the end of (b)(v), added “regardless of funding source.”

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1983, ch. 12, § 4, as amended by Laws 1985, ch. 228, § 2, which repealed this section, effective June 30, 1987, was repealed by Laws 1987, ch. 57, § 2.

Laws 1982, ch. 60, referred to throughout this section, appears as various sections throughout title 41, and as uncodified appropriation and temporary provisions. See Table of Disposition of Acts in volume 11.